Missouri, session 2026, SB997.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 565.021, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 565.021,
to read as follows:
565.021. 1. A person commits the offense of murder in
the second degree if he or she:
(1) Knowingly causes the death of another person or,
with the purpose of causing serious physical injury to
another person, causes the death of another person; [or]
(2) Commits or attempts to commit any felony, and, in
the perpetration or the attempted perpetration of such
felony or in the flight from the perpetration or attempted
perpetration of such felony, another person is killed as a
result of the perpetration or attempted perpetration of such
felony or immediate flight from the perpetration of such
felony or attempted perpetration of such felony; or
(3) Delivers or distributes fentanyl or any analogue
thereof to another person and where the death of such person
results from the use of the fentanyl or analogue thereof.
2. The offense of murder in the second degree is a
class A felony, and the punishment for second degree murder
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 997 2
shall be in addition to the punishment for commission of a
related felony or attempted felony, other than murder or
manslaughter.
3. Notwithstanding section 556.046 and section
565.029, in any charge of murder in the second degree, the
jury shall be instructed on, or, in a jury-waived trial, the
judge shall consider, any and all of the subdivisions in
subsection 1 of this section which are supported by the
evidence and requested by one of the parties or the court.
✓